District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.20

Authority to transact business — Foreign or alien companies.

Upon complying with the provisions of this chapter, a foreign or alien company organized as a stock, mutual, or reciprocal company, or as a Lloyd’s organization, but not otherwise, may be authorized by certificate of authority to transact in the District the kind or kinds of business which a domestic company similarly organized may be authorized to transact under this chapter. Such certificate of authority shall be issued as provided under § 31-2502.02. The issuance of a certificate of authority to a Lloyd’s organization shall be subject to the provisions of § 31-2502.20a. Any company chartered by special act of the legislature of its state of domicile prior to the effective date of this chapter, as provided in § 48 of this act, as a company without capital stock but doing business exclusively on the stock plan and maintaining at all times a surplus of not less than $300,000 shall, in the administration of this chapter, be considered as a stock company.

History

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1073, ch. 792, ch. II, § 20
June 27, 1960, 74 Stat. 222, Pub. L. 85-526, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1523.
1973 Ed., § 35-1323.

References in Text

“Section 48 of this act,” referred to in the last sentence of this section, means § 48 of the Act of October 9, 1940, which provided that such Act would be effective 30 days after October 9, 1940.